Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1478.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin EDINA; HIGHWAY 100 AND VERNON AVENUE/WEST 50TH STREET INTERCHANGE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin (a) $5,300,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds account in the state transportation fund as provided in Minnesota Statutes, section 174.50, to the commissioner of transportation for a grant to the city of Edina for preliminary design, design, engineering, and construction of an interchange at marked Trunk Highway 100 and Vernon Avenue/West 50th Street in the city of Edina. new text end new text begin (b) Any surplus land created upon completion of the interchange project under this section in the area bordered by Vernon Avenue/West 50th Street, Grange Road, Eden Avenue, and marked Trunk Highway 100 must be dedicated for use by the city of Edina as a fire station, a municipal campus, or both. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds account in the state transportation fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $5,300,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. The proceeds of the bonds, except accrued interest and any premium received on the sale of the bonds, must be credited to the bond proceeds account in the state transportation fund. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end